District of Columbia statutes.
3-1251.03

Committee meetings.

(a)

The Committee shall determine where meetings are held and the frequency of meetings.

(b)

Minutes of Committee meetings shall be confidential. Only Committee members shall have access to these documents.

(c)

Records of the Committee shall be privileged and confidential, and shall not be disclosed. The records shall be used by the Committee only in the exercise of the proper functions of the Committee, as set forth in this chapter, and shall not be public records. The records shall not be subject to court order, except as provided in § 3-1251.07, nor subject to discovery or introduction as evidence in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceedings, except those conducted by a health regulatory board.

(d)

A majority of the members serving on the Committee shall be required to establish a quorum.

May 1, 2001, D.C. Law 13-297, § 4, 48 DCR 2036